Louisiana, session 2026, SB84.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1028(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
22:1028(B)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1028. Early screening and detection requirements; examination; coverage
* * *
B.(1) Any health coverage plan which is delivered or issued for delivery in
the state shall provide coverage for detection of prostate cancer, including digital
rectal examination and prostate-specific antigen testing for men over the age of fifty
years and as medically necessary and appropriate for men over between the age ages
of forty to forty-nine years in accordance with the most recently published
guidelines from the National Comprehensive Cancer Network.
* * *
(3) Any coverage required pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection
shall not be subject to any cost-sharing amount, including deductibles,
coinsurance, copayment, or similar out-of-pocket expenses.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 84 ENROLLED
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any new policy, contract,
program, or health coverage plan issued on or after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract,
or health coverage plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the
provisions of this Act on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor, or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by this legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.